Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3. Sale of Light Wine, Beer, and Other Alcoholic Beverages

§ 67-3-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to legalize the sale within this state of light wines and beer, to legalize the manufacture of beer, and to regulate the business of manufacturing and of selling light wines and beer so as to prevent the illicit manufacture, sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages as defined in Section 67-1-5, the manufacture and sale of which it is not the purpose of this chapter to legalize.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10211; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi, and his authorized agents and employees.

“Person” means one or more persons, a company, a corporation, a partnership, a syndicate or an association.

“Brewpub” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 27-71-301.

“Beer” means a malt beverage as defined in the Federal Alcohol Administration Act and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to such act of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight.

“Light wine” means wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight.

“Small craft brewery” means a person having a permit under this chapter to manufacture or brew light wine or beer in this state and who manufactures or brews not more than sixty thousand (60,000) barrels of light wine or beer at all breweries that such person or its affiliates, subsidiary or parent company owns or controls or with whom such person contracts with for the manufacture of light wine or beer. For purposes of this paragraph, contract-brewed beer manufactured by a person having a permit under this chapter to manufacture or brew light wine or beer shall be included in the sixty-thousand-barrel limitation.

“Growler” means a sealed container that holds not more than one hundred twenty-eight (128) ounces of light wine or beer. A growler must have a label on it stating what it contains.

“Manufacturer” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 27-71-301.

“Contract-brewed beer” means beer brewed by a manufacturer who:

Makes the beer pursuant to a written contract with another beer manufacturer, and neither entity has a controlling interest in the other entity;

Makes the beer in accordance with a recipe that is a trade secret of the beer manufacturer having its beer made under contract; and

Has no right to sell the beer to any other beer manufacturer, importer or wholesaler other than the beer manufacturer who contracted for the beer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10210; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 8; Laws, 2003, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 136; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-5.
Light wines and beer legalized.

It shall be lawful, subject to the provisions set forth in this chapter, in this state to transport, store, sell, distribute, possess, receive and/or manufacture wine and beer, and it is hereby declared that it is the legislative intent that this chapter privileges the lawful sale and manufacture, within this state, of such light wines and beer. In determining if a wine product is “light wine,” or contains an alcoholic content of more than five percent (5%) by weight, or is not an “alcoholic beverage” as defined in the Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law, Chapter 1 of Title 67, Mississippi Code of 1972, the alcoholic content of such wine product shall be subject to the same permitted tolerance as is allowed by the labeling requirements for light wine provided for in Section 27-71-509.

Subject to the provisions set forth in this chapter, it shall be lawful in this state to transport, store, sell, distribute, possess, receive, and/or manufacture beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight, if the beer is manufactured to be sold legally in another state and is transported outside of this state for retail sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10207, 10228; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1987, ch. 355, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-7.
Local option elections in county.

If any county, at an election held for the purpose under the election laws of the state, shall by a majority vote of the duly qualified electors voting in the election determine that the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of wine and beer shall not be permitted in such county, then the same shall not be permitted therein except as authorized under Section 67-9-1 and as may be otherwise authorized in this section. An election to determine whether such transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of such beverages shall be excluded from any county in the state, shall, on a petition of twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified electors of such county, be ordered by the board of supervisors of the county, for such county only. No election on the question shall be held in any one (1) county more often than once in five (5) years.

In counties which have elected, or may elect by a majority vote of the duly qualified electors voting in the election, that the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of wine or beer shall not be permitted in the county, an election may be held in the same manner as the election hereinabove provided on the question of whether or not the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of said beverages shall be permitted in such county. Such election shall be ordered by the board of supervisors of such county on a petition of twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified electors of such county. No election on this question can be ordered more often than once in five (5) years.

Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful to possess beer or wine, as defined herein, in any municipality which has heretofore or which may hereafter vote in an election, pursuant to Section 67-3-9, in which a majority of the qualified electors vote in favor of permitting the sale and the receipt, storage and transportation for the purpose of sale of beer or wine as defined herein.

Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful to:

Possess or consume light wine or beer at a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5;

Sell, distribute and transport light wine or beer to a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5;

Sell light wine or beer at a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5 if such light wine or beer is sold by a person with a permit to engage in the business as a retailer of light wine or beer;

Transport beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if it is being transported to another state for legal sale in that state;

Transport legally purchased light wine or beer in unopened containers if it is being transported on a state or federal highway; however, this paragraph shall not apply to a retailer unless the retailer has purchased the light wine or beer from a wholesaler or distributor for the designated sales territory in which the retailer is located and the retailer has in his possession an invoice from the wholesaler or distributor for the light wine or beer; or

Transport homemade beer as authorized in Section 67-3-11.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10208; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1942, ch. 224; Laws, 1956, ch. 252; Laws, 1958, ch. 279; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 345, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013; Laws, 2018, ch. 385, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-3-9.
Local option elections in certain municipalities.

Any city in this state, having a population of not less than two thousand five hundred (2,500) according to the latest federal census; or any city in this state having a population of not less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) according to the latest federal census and located within three (3) miles of a city or county that permits the sale, receipt, storage and transportation for the purpose of sale of beer or light wine; at an election held for the purpose, under the election laws applicable to such city, may either prohibit or permit, except as otherwise provided under Section 67-9-1, the sale and the receipt, storage and transportation for the purpose of sale of beer and light wine. An election to determine whether such sale shall be permitted in cities wherein its sale is prohibited by law shall be ordered by the city council or mayor and board of aldermen or other governing body of such city for such city only, upon the presentation of a petition for such city to such governing board containing the names of twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such city asking for such election. In like manner, an election to determine whether such sale shall be prohibited in cities wherein its sale is permitted by law shall be ordered by the city council or mayor and board of aldermen or other governing board of such city for such city only, upon the presentation of a petition to such governing board containing the names of twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such city asking for such election. No election on either question shall be held by any one (1) city more often than once in five (5) years.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of such city in the manner prescribed by law upon the question of either permitting or prohibiting such sale, and the notice shall contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The tickets to be used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “For the legal sale of light wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight”; and the words “Against the legal sale of light wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight,” next below. In making up his ticket the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “For the legal sale of light wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight,” then the city council or mayor and board of aldermen or other governing body shall pass the necessary order permitting the legal sale of such light wine and beer in such city. If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “Against the legal sale of light wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight,” then the city council or mayor and board of aldermen or other governing body shall pass the necessary order prohibiting the sale of such light wine and beer in such city.

All laws or parts of laws in conflict with this section are hereby repealed to the extent of such conflict only, this section being cumulative and supplementary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10208.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 501, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 67-3-11.
Homemade wine or beer.

Every person shall have the right to make homemade wine for domestic or household uses only, free of all restraint by this chapter or otherwise, and no such election as provided for in Sections 67-3-7, 67-3-9 and 67-3-13, shall deprive any person of the right to make homemade wine for domestic or household uses only.

Every person twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall have the right to make homemade beer for personal, family, domestic or household uses without restraint by this chapter or otherwise if the beer is made in a county or municipality in which the possession of light wine or beer is lawful.

The maximum amount of homemade beer that a person may make in a calendar year shall not exceed:

One hundred (100) gallons if there is only one (1) person over the age of twenty-one (21) years of age residing in the household; and

Two hundred (200) gallons if there are two (2) or more persons over the age of twenty-one (21) years residing in the household.

A person who makes homemade beer as authorized in this section may remove the beer from the premises of the household where it is made and transport the beer only for the purpose of participating in a bona fide exhibition, contest or competition where homemade beer is being tasted and judged; however, homemade beer may not be sold or offered for sale under any circumstances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10209, 10227; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 2013, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 67-3-13.
Prohibition against possession of light wine and beer in dry counties; penalty; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided herein and as authorized under this section and Section 67-9-1, in any county which has at any time since February 26, 1934, elected, or which may hereafter elect, to prohibit the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of wine and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than four percent (4%) by weight in such county, it is hereby declared to be unlawful to possess such beverages therein. In any county which, after July 1, 1998, elects to prohibit the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of wine and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight in such county, it is hereby declared to be unlawful to possess such beer therein. In any county which, after July 1, 2012, elects to prohibit the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of wine of an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight in such county and beer of an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight, it is hereby declared to be unlawful to possess such beer therein. Any person found possessing any beer or wine of any quantity whatsoever in such county shall, on conviction, be imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days or fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or be both so fined and imprisoned.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in any county or municipality in which the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of light wine and beer is prohibited, it shall not be unlawful for a permitted wholesaler or distributor to possess light wine and beer when such light wine and beer is held therein solely for the purpose of storage and for distribution to other counties and municipalities in which possession of such beverages is lawful.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in any county in which transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of light wine and beer is prohibited, it shall not be unlawful:

To receive, store, possess or consume light wine or beer at a resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5;

To distribute and transport light wine or beer to a resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5;

To transport beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if it is being transported to another state for legal sale in that state;

To transport legally purchased light wine or beer in unopened containers if it is being transported on a state or federal highway; however, this paragraph shall not apply to a retailer unless the retailer has purchased the light wine or beer from a wholesaler or distributor for the designated sales territory in which the retailer is located and the retailer has in his possession an invoice from the wholesaler or distributor for the light wine or beer; or

To transport homemade beer as authorized in Section 67-3-11.

Any light wine or beer found in possession of, or sold by, a person in violation of this section shall be seized and disposed of in the manner provided for in Section 67-1-18.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10208; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1942, ch. 224; Laws, 1956, ch. 252; Laws, 1958, ch. 279; Laws, 1987, ch. 349; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 11; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 345, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 438, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2015); Laws, 2018, ch. 385, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-3-15.
Permit and/or license required.

Any person who shall brew or manufacture or sell any beer or light wine without first having secured a permit and/or license from the commissioner authorizing the brewing or manufacture or sale of such liquor, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, in the discretion of the court. Any person so convicted may not apply for any permit or license issued by the commissioner until five (5) years have elapsed from the date of such conviction.

This section shall not apply to beer authorized to be made pursuant to Section 67-3-11.

Any light wine or beer found in possession of, or sold by, a person in violation of this section shall be seized and disposed of in the manner provided for in Section 67-1-18.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10212; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1997, ch. 499, § 10; Laws, 2000, ch. 435, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 345, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 438, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2015).

§ 67-3-17.
Application for permit; oath.

Any person desiring to engage in any business taxable under Sections 27-71-303 through 27-71-317, Mississippi Code of 1972, either as a retailer, or as a wholesaler or distributor, or as a manufacturer, of light wines or beer, shall file with the commissioner an application for a permit allowing him to engage in such business. The application for a permit shall contain a statement showing the name of the business, and if a partnership, firm, association or limited liability company, the name of each partner or member, and if a corporation the names of two (2) principal officers, the post office address, and the nature of business in which engaged. In case any business is conducted at two (2) or more separate places, a separate permit for each place of business shall be required. The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the application and designate who is required to sign the application.The application shall be signed under penalty of perjury.

The application shall include a statement that the applicant will not, except as otherwise authorized in this chapter, allow any alcoholic beverages as defined in Section 67-1-5, any beer having an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight or any wine, having an alcoholic content of more than five percent (5%) by weight, to be kept, stored or secreted in or on the premises described in such permit or license, and that the applicant will not otherwise violate any law of this state, or knowingly allow any other person to violate any such law, while in or on such premises.

Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10238; Laws, 1934, ch. 127; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 22; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 566, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-19.
Qualifications of applicant for permit as retailer.

Where application is made for a permit to engage in the business of a retailer of light wine or beer, the applicant shall show in his application that he possesses the following qualifications:

Applicant must be a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age, of good moral character and a resident of the State of Mississippi.

Applicant shall not have been convicted of a felony, or of pandering or of keeping or maintaining a house of prostitution, or have been convicted within two (2) years of the date of his application of any violation of the laws of this state or the laws of the United States relating to alcoholic liquor.

Applicant shall not have had revoked, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding his application, any license or permit issued to him pursuant to the laws of this state, or any other state, to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind.

Applicant shall be the owner of the premises for which the permit is sought or the holder of an existing lease thereon.

Applicant shall not be residentially domiciled with any person whose permit has been revoked for cause, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding the date of the present application for a permit.

The applicant has not had any license or permit to sell beer or light wine at retail revoked, within five (5) years next preceding his application, due to a violation of Section 67-3-52.

Applicant shall not employ any person whose permit has been revoked when such person owned or operated the business on the premises for which a permit is sought or allow such person to have any financial interest in the business of the applicant, until such person is qualified to obtain a permit in his own name.

The applicant is not indebted to the State of Mississippi for any taxes.

If applicant is a partnership, all members of the partnership must be qualified to obtain a permit. Each member of the partnership must be a resident of the State of Mississippi.

If applicant is a corporation, all officers and directors thereof, and any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of such corporation, and the person or persons who shall conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for any individual permittee. However, the requirements as to residence shall not apply to officers, directors and stockholders of such corporation.

Any misstatement or concealment of fact in an application shall be ground for denial of the application or for revocation of the permit issued thereon.

The commissioner may refuse to issue a permit to an applicant for a place that is frequented by known criminals, prostitutes, or other law violators or troublemakers who disturb the peace and quietude of the community and frequently require the assistance of peace officers to apprehend such law violators or to restore order. The burden of proof of establishing the foregoing shall rest upon the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10238-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2007.).

§ 67-3-21.
Qualification of applicant for permit as distributor.

No permit shall be granted to a distributor unless the applicant therefor shall have been a resident of the State of Mississippi for at least two years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10222; Laws, 1934, ch. 171.

§ 67-3-22.
Brewpub production limits and unlawful acts.

The production limits for a brewpub shall be based upon production as determined by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 27-71-307, Mississippi Code of 1972, and a brewpub shall not manufacture more than seventy-five thousand (75,000) gallons of light wine or beer per calendar year.

Light wine or beer produced at a brewpub shall not be sold at a price less than it cost to manufacture such light wine or beer.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, light wine or beer manufactured by a brewpub shall not be sold away from the premises of such brewpub (as defined in Section 27-71-301, Mississippi Code of 1972) and shall not be packaged in any form that it may be carried away from the premises; however, the final one hundred (100) gallons of beer within a fermenting tank may be placed in kegs for sale on the premises to facilitate transition from one fermenting tank to another. A brewpub may sell light wine or beer manufactured by it for consumption off the premises of the brewpub if the light wine or beer so sold is contained in a growler.

A brewpub shall be required to offer for sale light wine or beer that is normally carried on the inventory of wholesalers or distributors of light wine or beer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 14, eff July 1, 1998, and shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2002; Laws, 2002, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 345, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-3-23.
Issuance, display, and transfer of permits.

Upon receipt of an application for a permit to engage in any business taxable under the provisions of Sections 27-71-303 through 27-71-317, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the oath required by Section 67-3-17, the commissioner shall issue to such applicant, without cost, a permit to engage in such business upon condition that the applicant shall obtain a license and pay the tax imposed under the provisions of law for the privilege of engaging, or continuing, in such business. Such permit shall be displayed at all times in some conspicuous place at the applicant’s place of business. No permit shall be transferable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10238; Laws, 1934, ch. 127.

§ 67-3-25.
Sales authorized by permit; expiration of permit; annual renewal; temporary permits; contents of permit.

Any permit issued authorizing the sale of light wines and/or beer for consumption shall be construed to authorize the sale of light wines and/or beer by the bottle, by the glass or by draught, and in or from the original package.

The commissioner is authorized to establish, in his discretion, dates for the expiration of permits issued under this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, permits shall be issued for twelve (12) months and shall be renewed annually on the first day of the month in which the permit expires. The commissioner may issue temporary permits for less than a full year. All permits shall show the effective date and expiration date of the permit, the business location, individual or business name and mailing address of the permittee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10213, 10216; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1946, ch. 383; Laws, 1977, ch. 337; Laws, 2011, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 67-3-27.
Licenses.

Before any person shall engage in the business of manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor or retailer of light wines or beer, he shall apply to the commissioner for a license to engage in such business, and shall pay to the commissioner the specific tax imposed by Section 27-71-303, for the privilege of engaging in such business. The commissioner upon receipt of such tax shall issue to such person a privilege license to engage in or continue in such business for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year. No such license shall be issued to the applicant unless such applicant shall have obtained from the commissioner a permit as required in Section 67-3-17. A brewpub shall obtain all necessary federal licenses and permits prior to obtaining any license under this chapter.

All privilege licenses issued under the provisions of this section shall be renewed annually on or before the first day of the month in which the current license expires.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10239; Laws, 1934, ch. 127; Laws, 1979, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 67-3-28.
Brewpub alcoholic content testing requirements.

Any person desiring to engage in business as a brewpub shall file with the commissioner, along with the application required by Section 67-3-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, a certificate issued by a licensed testing laboratory indicating that such laboratory has tested a sample of the applicant’s beer or light wine, or both, and that the alcohol content of such sample of beer does not exceed eight percent (8%) by weight and the alcoholic content of such light wine does not exceed five percent (5%) by weight.

Every brewpub shall be required to submit to random testing by the commissioner to determine whether any beer being manufactured, sold, kept, stored or secreted by the license holder contains an alcohol content greater than eight percent (8%) by weight and any light wine being manufactured, sold, kept, stored or secreted by the license holder contains an alcoholic content greater than five percent (5%) by weight. The commissioner shall establish and administer testing standards and procedures to be used in such random testing. The brewpub licensee shall be responsible for all costs incurred by the commissioner in conducting random testing under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 308, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 67-3-29.
Revocation or suspension of permit by commissioner.

The commissioner, or a hearing officer or the board of review, as designated by the commissioner, after a show cause hearing, shall revoke or suspend any permit granted by authority of this chapter to any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter or the revenue laws of this state relating to engaging in transporting, storing, selling, distributing, possessing, receiving or manufacturing of wines or beers, or any person who shall hereafter be convicted of the unlawful sale of intoxicating liquor, or any person who shall allow or permit any form of illegal gambling or immorality on the premises described in such permit. The commissioner shall not revoke or suspend a permit of a retailer for the sale of light wine or beer to a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years until there has been a conviction of the permit holder or an employee of the permit holder for such violation.

If any person exercising any privilege taxable under the provisions of Chapter 71 of Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall willfully neglect or refuse to comply with the provisions of such chapter, or any rules or regulations promulgated by the commissioner under authority of such chapter, or the provisions of this chapter, including maintaining the qualifications of an applicant under Section 67-3-19, during the permit period, the commissioner shall be authorized to revoke or suspend the permit theretofore issued to the person. Any person whose permit shall have been revoked by the commissioner shall be thereafter prohibited from exercising any privilege under the provisions of Chapter 71 of Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, for a period of two (2) years from the date of the revocation. The commissioner may, however, for good cause shown, grant a new permit upon such conditions as the commissioner may prescribe. Any person whose permit shall have been suspended by the commissioner shall be prohibited from exercising any privilege under the provisions of Chapter 71 of Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, during the period of the suspension. Failure of the person to comply with the terms of the suspension shall be cause for revocation of his permit, in addition to the other penalties provided by law.

In addition to the reasons specified in this section and other provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the permit of any permit holder for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or Section 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or Section 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10213, 10257; Laws, 1934, chs. 127, 171; Laws, 1946, ch. 383; Laws, 1973, ch. 467, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 368, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 18; Laws, 2005, ch. 499, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 67-3-31.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; affidavit and complaint.

Proceedings for the revocation or suspension of any permit authorizing the sale of beer or wine at retail for a violation of any of the provisions of Section 67-3-53 may be brought in the circuit or county court of the county in which the licensed premises are located. Such proceedings shall be entitled in the name of the state and against the permittee and shall be instituted by filing a complaint with the clerk of the court. The complaint may be filed by the county prosecuting attorney of the county upon his own initiative or, then by the district attorney of the district in which the county is located, and it shall be mandatory upon the county prosecuting attorney, or district attorney, as the case may be, to file a complaint when requested to do so by a peace officer or any person as provided in this section. Any peace officer within his jurisdiction or any enforcement officer of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within the Department of Revenue who learns that a retail permittee within his jurisdiction has violated any of the provisions of such section shall file with the county prosecuting attorney of the county in which the licensed premises are located, or, then with the district attorney of the district in which such county is located, an affidavit specifying in detail the facts alleged to constitute such violation, and requesting that a complaint be filed against the permittee for the revocation or suspension of his permit. A like affidavit may be filed with the county prosecuting attorney, or district attorney, as the case may be, by any person who resides, and has for at least one (1) year prior thereto resided within the county in which the licensed premises are located requesting that a complaint be filed for the revocation or suspension of the permittee’s permit. Promptly upon receiving any such affidavit the county prosecuting attorney, or district attorney, shall prepare a proper complaint, which shall be signed and sworn to by the person or persons filing the affidavit with him, and the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney shall file the complaint with the clerk of the circuit or county court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1997, ch. 558, § 3; reenacted and amended, 1998, ch. 520, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 462, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 67-3-33.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; service of notice.

Upon filing a complaint with the clerk of the court, the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney filing the same shall promptly move the court to set the complaint for hearing. The court shall set the complaint for hearing at an early date in term time or in vacation and such proceedings shall have precedence for trial over all civil actions. Upon a date for trial being set by the court, the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney shall serve or cause to be served upon the permittee in accordance with the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure a notice of the filing of said complaint, together with a copy of said complaint, and shall set forth in said notice the time and place of the hearing thereon. Said notice shall be served upon the permittee at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for hearing if personal service be made. If service be made by mail, such notice shall be deposited in the United States mail not less than twelve (12) days prior to the date set for hearing. A copy of said complaint and notice of hearing thereon shall also be mailed to the commissioner by the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 118, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 67-3-35.
Judicial revocation or suspension of permit; hearing and judgment.

The complaint shall be heard by the court without a jury. If the court shall find upon the hearing that the offense or offenses charged in the complaint have been established by the evidence, the court shall order the revocation or suspension of the permit. If the court finds that the permittee has not previously violated the law in the operation of his licensed business, and that no permit or license held by him has previously been suspended or revoked, and if it appears to the satisfaction of the court that there is reasonable ground to expect that the permittee will not again commit the offense or offenses charged in the complaint and that to revoke the permit would be unduly severe, then the court may suspend the permit for such period of time as the court deems proper. However, if the permittee has previously had his permit suspended or revoked, it shall be mandatory upon the court upon a finding of guilty to revoke the said permit. The judgment of the court revoking or suspending such permit shall not be superseded or stayed during the pendency of an appeal therefrom. A certified copy of the final order or decree of the court shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court to the commissioner.

After the filing of a complaint with the clerk of the court for the revocation or suspension of a permit, the court in which the complaint is filed shall retain jurisdiction to hear and determine such complaint and to enter judgment revoking or suspending such permit. For the purpose of such hearing and as to the effect of the judgment of the court entered pursuant thereto, the permit shall be in full force and effect even though the permittee, after filing of such complaint, may have surrendered his permit, or such permit may have expired, or the rights of the permittee thereunder may have otherwise terminated. It is the purpose of this section to preclude the permittee from avoiding the effect of a judgment of revocation by a court by reason of conditions arising subsequent to the filing of a complaint.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10223; Laws, 1934, ch. 171; Laws, 1944, ch. 133, §§ 2-4.